Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 10 Selection of Jury

9-10-1.
Notice by court of jurors required — Notifications to sergeants and constables.

From time to time as occasion may require, the superior court or family court shall direct notices to be sent by the clerk thereof to the jury commissioner that there will be required for the county or counties for which the court is held a certain number of grand or petit jurors and the time and place at which they are required to attend. And the jury commissioner, on receiving the notice, shall take from the list of jurors qualified as provided in chapter 9 of this title, in the order in which their names appear on the jury list, so many names as may be required to ensure the attendance of the number of jurors required by the court and shall issue notifications to the city or town sergeant or any certified constable, either in person, or by one of his or her assistants, or by registered or certified mail, and under his or her hand and seal, designating who are grand and petit jurors, and the time and place at which the jurors are required to attend. Upon consent of the town sergeant of the town where any juror resides, the jury commissioner may retain the notifications for service by the jury commissioner or his or her agents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 20; G.L., ch. 329, § 22, as enacted by P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 12; P.L. 1927, ch. 1015, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 20; G.L., ch. 506, § 18, as enacted by P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 71, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 20; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 10.

9-10-2.
Service of notice on jurors.

The city or town sergeant or certified constable, upon receipt of the notification as provided in , shall forthwith make service of the notification upon the persons named therein as jurors by delivering to each of them, or by leaving at their last and usual place of abode, a notice substantially in the following form: §

9-10-1

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND Sc. TO Greeting: You are hereby notified that you have been drawn as a juror for the superior or family court for the county (or counties) of and you are required to attend the said court be holden at on the day of , at o'clock in the forenoon. Sergeant. Constable. The jury commissioner or his or her agents, having retained the notifications in accordance with , shall forthwith serve the notifications in the same form as contained in this section by regular mail. §

9-10-1

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, §§ 21, 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, §§ 21, 22; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 12; P.L. 1927, ch. 1015, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 20; G.L., ch. 506, § 18, as enacted by P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-2

; P.L. 1979, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 71, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 20; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 10; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 6, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 6, effective June 23, 2021.

9-10-3.
Service of summons by jury commissioner.

Whenever on receipt of a notice from the clerk of the superior or family court for grand or petit jurors it shall appear to the jury commissioner to be impossible to get the returns from the officer or officers who customarily serve the summons in proper time for the commissioner to make his or her returns to the clerk of the court, or upon consent of the town sergeant of the town where any juror resides, in accordance herewith, then the jury commissioner or some person connected with his or her office designated by him or her for such purpose may serve the summons upon any such jurors as have been listed for service at a session of the court; provided, that when any such summons is served by the jury commissioner or person designated by him or her, the town or city in which the service is made shall not be liable for the payment of the fee mentioned in §

9-10-2

.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 329, § 22, as enacted by P.L. 1927, ch. 1015, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 20; G.L., ch. 506, § 18, as enacted by P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-3

; P.L. 1979, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 71, § 2.

9-10-4.
Return of notifications — Certificate as to investigation of jurors.

The notifications when served shall be returned forthwith by the officer serving them, either in person or by registered or certified mail, to the jury commissioner, who shall make out a list of the persons served, with their names, occupations, and residence appearing thereon and send the list, together with the notification, to the clerk of the court from which the notice came. Upon each list sent, the jury commissioner shall certify that all the names thereon contained are persons who have been investigated by him or her personally, or through his or her assistants, and found in his or her judgment to be persons well qualified to serve as jurors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 22; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 12; P.L. 1927, ch. 1015, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 18; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-4

.

9-10-5.
Penalty for failure to serve notice on juror.

Every officer charged with a notification to any person drawn as juror, who shall neglect to serve and return the notification as required in §

9-10-4

, shall for each offense be fined twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 19; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-5

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 20.

9-10-6.
Service prohibited unless name drawn.

No person shall serve on any grand or petit jury in the courts of this state unless he or she shall have been drawn as hereinbefore provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 20; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-6

.

9-10-7.
Disqualification by prior jury service.

No person summoned shall be qualified to serve as a juror who has served as a juror within three (3) years next preceding the time when he or she shall be so summoned; and the court shall, upon calling the person so summoned, inquire of him or her if he or she has so served.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 21; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-7

; P.L. 2001, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 288, § 1.

9-10-8.
Period of service of jurors.

No person summoned as a petit juror shall be required to serve more than two (2) weeks in any year in which he or she may be summoned; unless at the expiration of the period of two (2) weeks he or she shall be actually serving on a jury theretofore impaneled to try an issue then pending and undetermined, in which case he or she shall continue to serve until the trial is concluded. Notwithstanding the above provisions, if a juror has been tentatively selected to serve on a jury by the parties litigant and the juror has not been formally sworn and impaneled by the end of the two (2) week period, the trial judge, in his or her discretion, may extend the two (2) week term until the trial is concluded or until the juror is excused. Provided every person summoned as a grand juror shall serve as such in the term for which he or she is summoned for such time or times as the court may require and until a succeeding grand jury shall be called and impaneled as provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 26; P.L. 1921, ch. 2102, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 26; P.L. 1928, ch. 1204, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 22; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-8

; P.L. 1972, ch. 112, § 1.

9-10-9.
Grounds for excuse from service.

A justice of the superior court or the family court, or the jury commissioner, may excuse a person from jury duty or may continue the date of the service upon a showing of mental or physical disability, illness, or the serious illness of some member of his or her immediate family, economic or domestic hardship, or other good cause; provided, that he or she may be required to serve his or her term or the remainder thereof, as the case may be, on an emergency panel of jurors, if such a panel is deemed necessary by the jury commissioner or the presiding justice of the superior or family court. The discretion to so excuse may be exercised by the appropriate party at any time during the selection or assignment of jurors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 23; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-9

; P.L. 1980, ch. 242, § 1.

9-10-10.
Penalty for failure of juror to attend.

Every person duly notified to attend any court as juror, who does not attend as required or give satisfactory excuse to the court for not attending, or shall absent himself/herself therefrom without leave of the court, shall be brought before the court and, upon being adjudged in contempt, shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 24; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-10

.

9-10-11.
Fines levied against jurors.

All fines incurred by jurors and persons returned or notified as jurors under this chapter shall be levied and collected to the use of the state by warrant of distress from the court, directed to the sheriff or his or her deputy of the county in which the person dwells or his or her estate is to be found.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 25; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-11

.

9-10-11.1.
Size of juries in civil cases.

Juries in civil cases shall be composed of six (6) persons and such alternate jurors as may be called pursuant to §

9-10-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 156, § 1.

9-10-11.2.
Qualification and division of petit jury panels.

The presiding justice of the superior court and the chief judge of the family court may assign a justice of those courts or the jury commissioner for the purpose of qualifying petit jurors and dividing the petit jury panels into subpanels. The assigned justice shall order the panel of petit jurors to be divided into two (2) or more subpanels, constituting of not less than twenty-five (25) members each in criminal cases and fifteen (15) members each in civil cases, so that juries may be impaneled from less than the total number summoned in several courtrooms and in civil and criminal cases at the same time; and the assigned justice may thereafter order the consolidation of several subpanels or all of them or may order additions to each of them from other subpanels and may continue, in like manner, as often as he or she shall deem it to be necessary to accomplish the purpose of this section. The subdivision of the panel into subpanels and additions to the subpanels shall be by lot and the names of jurors so drawn by lot shall be placed in a box provided for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 98, § 2.

9-10-12.
Drawing and impaneling of trial jury.

On the day when the petit jurors are summoned to attend at a court in any court for the trial of either civil or criminal cases, the clerk shall cause the name and place of abode of each person summoned as a juror to be written upon a separate paper, all of which papers shall be as nearly as may be of the same size, and shall cause them to be placed in a box provided for that purpose. When a case is brought on to be tried, the clerk in open court shall shake the papers thoroughly and shall then draw out twelve (12) papers in criminal cases or six (6) papers in civil cases, one after the other, or such other number as ordered by the court. If any of the persons whose names are so drawn do not appear, or are excused, or are set aside, the clerk shall draw out other papers until the names of an appropriate number of jurors are drawn who appear and are not excused or set aside. The jurors shall be duly sworn and impaneled, and shall be the jury to try the issue, and one of them shall be appointed foreperson by the court. The names of the jurors so sworn shall be kept by themselves and, when the verdict of the jury has been recorded or when the jury has been discharged by consent of parties or by leave of court, shall be returned to the box; and this process shall be repeated in each case when an issue is brought on to be tried by the jury; but if an issue is so brought on before the verdict in any other case has been recorded or the jury in the case has been discharged, the court may order a jury for the trial of such issue to be impaneled by drawing, in the manner provided, of papers from those then remaining in the box.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 32; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-12

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 5; P.L. 1977, ch. 156, § 2.

9-10-12.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 156, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 98, § 1.

9-10-12.2.
Subpanels in any county.

The provisions of §

9-10-11.2

may be made applicable to any county outside the counties of Providence and Bristol by order of the presiding justice of the superior court whenever he or she shall determine that the expedition of jury trials in that county will be furthered or improved thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 98, § 3.

9-10-13.
Alternate jurors.

Whenever in the opinion of the court the trial of a civil case before a jury is likely to be a protracted one, the court may, immediately after the jury is impaneled and sworn, direct the calling of one or two (2) additional jurors, to be known as alternate jurors. Alternate jurors shall be drawn from the same source, and in the same manner, and have the same qualifications, as regular jurors, and be subject to examination and challenge as such jurors, except that each party shall be allowed one peremptory challenge for each alternate juror. The alternate jurors shall take the proper oath or affirmation and shall be seated near the regular jurors with equal facilities for seeing and hearing the proceedings in the cause and shall attend at all times upon the trial of the cause in company with the regular jurors. They shall obey all orders and admonitions of the court, and if the regular jurors are ordered to be kept in the custody of an officer during the trial of the cause, the alternate jurors shall also be kept with the other jurors and, except as hereinafter provided, shall be discharged upon the final submission of the cause to the jury. If, before the final submission of the cause, a regular juror dies or is discharged, the court shall order the alternate juror, if there is but one, to take his or her place in the jury box. If there are two (2) alternate jurors, the court shall select one by lot, who shall then take his or her place in the jury box. After an alternate juror is in the jury box he or she shall be subject to the same rules as a regular juror.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 321/2; P.L. 1940, ch. 936, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-13

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 5.

9-10-14.
Court examination of prospective jurors.

The court shall, on motion of either party in a suit, examine on oath a person who is called as a juror therein, to know whether he or she is related to either party, has any interest in the cause, or has expressed or formed an opinion or is sensible of any bias or prejudice therein; and the party objecting to the juror may introduce any other competent evidence in support of the objection. The court may permit the parties or their attorneys to conduct the examination of the person called as a juror. If it appears to the court that the juror does not stand indifferent in the cause, another shall be called in his or her stead for the trial of that cause, but at no time shall counsel for either party be precluded from examining prospective jurors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 33; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-14

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 21; P.L. 1970, ch. 235, § 1.

9-10-15.
Residence or tax payment in town not ground for challenge.

In complaints, indictments, and penal actions for the recovery of any sum of money or other thing forfeited, it shall not be cause for challenge to a juror that he or she resides or is liable to pay taxes in any town which may be benefited thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 28; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-15

.

9-10-16.
State citizenship not ground for challenge.

No person shall be disqualified to act as a juror in any case in which the state is directly or indirectly a party by reason of his or her being a citizen thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 31; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-16

.

9-10-17.
Waiver of objection to juror by silence.

If a party knows of any objection to a juror before the case is opened to the jury and omits to suggest it to the court, he or she shall not afterwards make the objection, unless by express leave of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 348; G.L. 1909, ch. 291, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 341, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 507, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-17

.

9-10-18.
Peremptory challenges.

Either party in a civil action may, before the opening of the action or proceeding to the jury, challenge in writing, addressed to the clerk of the court, any qualified jurors called for the trial of the cause or proceeding, not exceeding one in three (3), without alleging or showing any cause therefor; and after the objection the challenged jurors shall not sit in the trial of the cause, but other jurors shall be called to take the place of the challenged jurors for the trial of the cause.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 349; G.L. 1909, ch. 291, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 341, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 507, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-18

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 5; P.L. 1977, ch. 156, § 2.

9-10-19.
Keeping and disposition of peremptory challenges.

Written objections or challenges, filed under the provisions of §

9-10-18

, shall be kept in such place and shall be disposed of in such manner, as the court shall direct.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 350; G.L. 1909, ch. 291, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 341, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 507, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-19

.

9-10-20.
Oaths of jurors.

Grand and petit jurors, before acting as such, shall take the oath prescribed for them in the following terms: GRAND JURORS OATH “You severally and solemnly swear (or, affirm) that as members of the grand inquest for the body of the county (or counties) of you will diligently inquire and true presentment make of all such crimes and misdemeanors cognizable by this court as shall come to your knowledge: the state's council, your fellow's and your own, will keep secret: will present no person for envy, hatred or malice: neither will you leave any person unpresented for love, fear, favor, affection or hope of reward: but you will present things truly, as they come to your knowledge, according to the best of your understanding: So help you God. (Or: This affirmation you make and give upon peril of the penalty of perjury.)” PETIT JURORS OATH IN CRIMINAL CASES “You swear (or, affirm) that you will well and truly try and true deliverance make between the state of Rhode Island and the prisoner (or, defendant) at the bar according to law and the evidence given you: So help you God. (Or: This affirmation you make and give upon peril of the penalty of perjury.)” PETIT JURORS OATH IN CIVIL CASES “You swear (or, affirm) that in all cases between party and party, that shall be committed to you, you will give a true verdict therein, according to law and the evidence given you: So help you God. (Or: This affirmation you make and give upon peril of the penalty of perjury.)”

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 29; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-20

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 6, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 6, effective June 23, 2021.

9-10-21.
Exemption of juror from process.

The person and estate of every juror attending any court in this state shall be exempt from all process in any civil action during the period of his or her attendance on the court and for three (3) days next before the time he or she shall be required to appear and for the three (3) days next after he or she shall be discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 26; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-21

.

9-10-22.
Service of forbidden process void.

The service of all process contrary to §

9-10-21

shall be void.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 27; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-10-22

.